test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-skappi_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - skappi: # i-stems
    skappi+N+Sg+Nom: skappi
    skappi+N+Sg+Gen: skaapi
    skappi+N+Sg+Acc: skaapi
    skappi+N+Sg+Ill: skaapin
    skappi+N+Sg+Loc: skaapist
    skappi+N+Sg+Com: skappijn
    skappi+N+Sg+Abe: skapittáá
    skappi+N+Ess: skappin
    skappi+N+Par: skappid
    skappi+N+Pl+Nom: skaapih
    skappi+N+Pl+Gen: skaapij
    skappi+N+Pl+Acc: skaapijd
    skappi+N+Pl+Ill: skappijd
    skappi+N+Pl+Loc: skaapijn
    skappi+N+Pl+Com: skapijguin
    skappi+N+Pl+Abe: skapijttáá
